Vermont, session 2025-2026, H236.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1252(a) is amended to read:
VT LEG #379754 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.236
2025 Page 2 of 3
(a) The State adopts, for the purposes of individually classifying the uses of
its high quality waters, the following classes and definitions:
Class A(1): Waters in a natural condition that have significant
ecological value;
Class A(2): Waters that are suitable for a public water source with
filtration and disinfection or other required treatment; character uniformly
excellent.;
Class B(1): Waters in which one or more uses are of demonstrably and
consistently higher quality than Class B(2) waters; or
Class B(2): Waters that are suitable for swimming and other primary
contact recreation; irrigation and agricultural uses; aquatic biota and aquatic
habitat; good aesthetic value; boating, fishing, and other recreational uses and;
suitable for public water source with filtration and disinfection or other
required treatment; and suitable for use by a hydroelectric power generation
facility with a proposed installed capacity of five megawatts or less.
Sec. 2. ANR AMENDMENT OF VERMONT WATER QUALITY
STANDARDS
(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
amend by rule the Vermont Water Quality Standards to reflect the inclusion
under 10 V.S.A. § 1252 of hydroelectric power generation facilities with a
VT LEG #379754 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.236
2025 Page 3 of 3
proposed installed capacity of five megawatts or less as a suitable use of Class
B(2) waters.
(b) Prior to July 1, 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall not deny
approval of a Class B(2) water for use by a hydroelectric power generation
facility with a proposed installed capacity of five megawatts or less without
demonstrating that the use of the water by the hydroelectric power generation
facility would impair the water.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379754 v.1